Illinois, session 104th, HB3840.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is amended 5by changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 65/14)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1264)7    Sec. 14. Homeless Veterans Demonstration Project. (a) The 8Program Administrator shall, on the the recommendation of the 9Commission and in cooperation with the Department of Veterans' 10Affairs, implement a demonstration project for low and very 11low-income homeless veterans and their families. This 12demonstration project shall consist of a short-term shelter, 13and will also provide assistance in assessing the needs of 14veterans, ascertaining the programs for which veterans may be 15eligible and making application for such programs and services 16and referral to appropriate agencies. The project shall, to 17the extent possible, establish liaisons with labor 18organizations, community colleges, vocational rehabilitation 19programs and other providers of trade apprenticeships and 20other job training programs.21    (b) The Program Administrator shall submit to the Governor 22and the General Assembly a report by January 1, 1991 23evaluating the effectiveness of the project provided in this   HB3840- 2 -LRB104 11419 KTG 21507 b1Section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the 2number of persons served under the project, information as to 3the cost of the services, and recommendations as to whether 4additional homeless veterans projects should be established.5(Source: P.A. 86-925.)